Florida, session 2026, SB986.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 16 17 Section 1.âSection 386.202, Florida Statutes, is amended to 18 read: 19 386.202âLegislative intent.âThe purpose of this part is to 20 protect people from the health hazards of secondhand tobacco and 21 marijuana smoke and vapor and to implement the Florida health 22 initiative in s. 20, Art. X of the State Constitution. It is the 23 intent of the Legislature to not inhibit, or otherwise obstruct, 24 medical or scientific research, or smoking or vaping cessation 25 programs approved by the Department of Health. 26 Section 2.âPresent subsections (9) through (17) of section 27 386.203, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (10) 28 through (18), respectively, a new subsection (9) is added to 29 that section, and present subsections (11) and (13) of that 30 section are amended, to read: 31 386.203âDefinitions.âAs used in this part: 32 (9)ââPublic placeâ means a place to which the public has 33 access, including, but not limited to, streets; sidewalks; 34 highways; public parks; public beaches; and the common areas, 35 both inside and outside, of schools, hospitals, government 36 buildings, apartment buildings, office buildings, lodging 37 establishments, restaurants, transportation facilities, and 38 retail shops. 39 (12)(11)ââSmokingâ means inhaling, exhaling, burning, 40 carrying, or possessing any lighted tobacco or marijuana 41 product, including cigarettes, cigars, pipe tobacco, and any 42 other lighted tobacco or marijuana product. 43 (14)(13)ââVapeâ or âvapingâ means to inhale or exhale vapor 44 produced by a vapor-generating electronic device or to possess a 45 vapor-generating electronic device while that device is actively 46 employing an electronic, a chemical, or a mechanical means 47 designed to produce vapor or aerosol from a nicotine or 48 marijuana product or any other substance. The term does not 49 include the mere possession of a vapor-generating electronic 50 device. 51 Section 3.âSection 386.204, Florida Statutes, is amended to 52 read: 53 386.204âProhibition.âA person may not smoke or vape in an 54 enclosed indoor workplace or smoke or vape a marijuana product 55 in a public place, except as otherwise provided in s. 386.2045. 56 Section 4.âSubsection (6) is added to section 386.205, 57 Florida Statutes, to read: 58 386.205âCustoms smoking rooms.âA customs smoking room may 59 be designated by the person in charge of an airport in-transit 60 lounge under the authority and control of the Bureau of Customs 61 and Border Protection of the United States Department of 62 Homeland Security. A customs smoking room may be designated only 63 in an airport in-transit lounge under the authority and control 64 of the Bureau of Customs and Border Protection of the United 65 States Department of Homeland Security. A customs smoking room 66 may not be designated in an elevator, restroom, or any common 67 area as defined by s. 386.203. Each customs smoking room must 68 conform to the following requirements: 69 (6)âSmoking or vaping of marijuana products is prohibited 70 in the customs smoking room at any time. 71 Section 5.âParagraph (a) of subsection (5) of section 72 561.695, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 73 561.695âStand-alone bar enforcement; qualification; 74 penalties.â 75 (5)âAfter the initial designation, to continue to qualify 76 as a stand-alone bar, the licensee must provide to the division 77 annually, on or before the licenseeâs annual renewal date, an 78 affidavit that certifies, with respect to the preceding 12-month 79 period, the following: 80 (a)âNo more than 10 percent of the gross revenue of the 81 business is from the sale of food consumed on the licensed 82 premises as described defined in s. 386.203(13) s. 386.203(12). 83 84 The division shall establish by rule the format of the affidavit 85 required by this subsection. A licensed vendor shall not 86 knowingly make a false statement on the affidavit required by 87 this subsection. In addition to the penalties provided in 88 subsection (7), a licensed vendor who knowingly makes a false 89 statement on the affidavit required by this subsection may be 90 subject to suspension or revocation of the vendorâs alcoholic 91 beverage license under s. 561.29. 92 Section 6.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.